Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1525
Services; requirements.

Respite services made available through the Nebraska Lifespan Respite Services Program shall:

(1) Include a flexible array of respite care options responsive to family and caregiver needs and available before families and caregivers are in a crisis;

(2) Be sensitive to the unique needs, strengths, and cultural values of an individual, family, or caregiver;

(3) Offer the most efficient access to an array of coordinated respite services that are built on existing community support and services;

(4) Be driven by community strengths, needs, and resources; and

(5) Use a variety of funds and resources, including, but not limited to:

(a) Family or caregiver funds;

(b) Private and volunteer resources;

(c) Public funds; and

(d) Exchange of care among families or caregivers.

Laws 1999, LB 148, § 6.